Vermont, session 2025-2026, H87.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 941 is amended to read:
§ 941. FLEXIBLE PATHWAYS INITIATIVE
(a) There is created within the Agency a Flexible Pathways Initiative:
(1) to encourage and support the creativity of school districts as they
develop and expand high-quality educational experiences that are an integral
part of secondary education in the evolving 21st Century century classroom;
(2) to promote opportunities for Vermont students to achieve
postsecondary readiness through high-quality educational experiences that
acknowledge individual goals, learning styles, and abilities; and
(3) to increase the rates of secondary school completion and
postsecondary continuation and retention in Vermont.
(b) The Secretary shall develop, publish, and regularly update guidance, in
the form of technical assistance, sharing of best practices and model
documents, legal interpretations, and other support designed to assist school
districts:
(1) to To identify and support secondary students who require additional
assistance to succeed in school and to identify ways in which individual
students would benefit from flexible pathways to graduation;.
(2) to To work with every student in grade 7 seven through grade 12 in
an ongoing personalized learning planning process that:
VT LEG #378660 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.87
2025 Page 3 of 4
(A) identifies the student’s emerging abilities, aptitude, and
disposition;
(B) includes participation by families and other engaged adults;
(C) guides decisions regarding course offerings and other high-
quality educational experiences; and
(D) identifies career and postsecondary planning options using
resources provided pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection (b); and
(D)(E) is documented by a personalized learning plan;.
(3) to To create opportunities for secondary students to pursue flexible
pathways to graduation that:
(A) increase aspiration and encourage postsecondary continuation of
training and education;
(B) are an integral component of a student’s personalized learning
plan; and
(C) include:
(i) applied or work-based learning opportunities, including career
and career technical education and internships;
(ii) virtual learning and blended learning;
(iii) dual enrollment opportunities as set forth in section 944 of
this title;
VT LEG #378660 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.87
2025 Page 4 of 4
(iv) early college programs as set forth in subsection 4011(e) of
this title;
(v) [Repealed.]
(vi) adult education and secondary credential opportunities as set
forth in section 945 of this title; and.
(4) to To provide students, beginning no not later than in grade 7 seven,
with career development and postsecondary planning resources to ensure that
they are able to take full advantage of the opportunities available within the
flexible pathways to graduation and to achieve their career and postsecondary
education and training goals. Resources provided pursuant to this subdivision
shall include information regarding the admissions process and requirements
necessary to proceed with any and all military-related opportunities.
(c) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as discouraging or
limiting the authority of any school district to develop or continue to provide
educational opportunities for its students that are otherwise permitted,
including the provision of Advanced Placement courses.
(d) An individual entitlement or private right of action shall not arise from
creation of a personalized learning plan.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378660 v.1